Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3801
Act, how cited.

Sections 2-3801 to 2-3812 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Agricultural Products Marketing Act.

Laws 1979, LB 538, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 561, § 2.